California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1138, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

7504.2.

Examinations and reexaminations shall be given at least once every other month at such places and on such specific dates as the chief may from time to time determine and fix.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1138, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

7504.3.

In order to be eligible for an initial examination, an applicant shall have completed and filed his or her application together with the application fee prescribed by this chapter in the office of the bureau in Sacramento, California, not later than 30 days prior to the next scheduled examination date. Applicants whose applications are not completed and filed within the time limits of this section may, at the discretion of the bureau, be scheduled for the first examination next following the scheduled examination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1015, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

7504.4.

If an applicant fails to pass an initial examination, the applicant shall not be eligible for a subsequent examination except upon payment of the reexamination fee for each subsequent examination, accompanied by a completed application for reexamination filed within the time limits and conditions relating to applications for initial examinations provided in Section 7504.3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 416, Sec. 2.   (AB 913)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

7504.5.

All applicants shall be examined concerning their competency, experience, and qualifications by the chief and the chief may take testimony of anyone in regard thereto under oath.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1138, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

7504.6.

If an applicant fails to complete his or her application within one year after it has been filed, or fails to take the examination within a one-year period after becoming eligible therefor, the application shall be considered to be abandoned. An application submitted subsequent to the abandonment of a former application shall be treated as a new application.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1138, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

7504.7.

(a) Except as provided in this section, every qualification certificate issued or renewed under this chapter is subject to the same renewal provisions that apply to a repossession agency license as set forth in Sections 7503.10, 7503.11, 7503.12, 7503.13, and 7503.14.

(b) An initial qualification certificate shall expire one year following the date of issuance, unless renewed as provided in this chapter.

(c) A renewal qualification certificate shall expire two years following the date of renewal, unless renewed as provided in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 377, Sec. 4.   (SB 609)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

7504.8.

A person may work as a qualified certificate holder pending receipt of the qualification certificate if he or she has been approved by the bureau and carries on his or her person a hardcopy printout of the bureau’s approval from the bureau’s Internet Web site and a valid picture identification. If a qualification certificate is lost, damaged, or destroyed, a certificate holder may continue to operate by carrying on his or her person a hardcopy printout or electronic copy of the bureau’s approval of the certificate from the bureau’s Internet Web site and a valid picture identification.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 432, Sec. 19.   (SB 944)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Offices [7505. - 7505.5.]

7505.

A licensee desiring to operate a repossession business at a location other than the address shown on his or her license shall apply and qualify for a license for each additional location. A licensee desiring to operate a repossession business under one or more fictitious trade styles shall apply and qualify for a license for each fictitious trade style. No licensee shall indicate, or cause to be indicated, in any printed matter, or in any directory or listing, that he or she conducts a repossession business under any name, or at any address, other than the names and addresses for which he or she is licensed.

An application for a license for an additional location or an additional trade style shall be in the same form, and the applicant shall meet the same requirements, as for an original license.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1138, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

7505.1.

Every office licensed as a repossession agency shall be under the active charge of a qualified certificate holder. Nothing in this chapter prohibits a licensee from having more than one qualified certificate holder in an office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 322, Sec. 3.   (AB 515)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

7505.3.

(a) Whenever a qualified certificate holder actively in charge of an office ceases to be in charge, the licensee shall file with the bureau notice, in writing, within 30 days from that cessation.

If the notice is filed, the license shall remain in force for a period of 90 days after the filing of the notice. At the end of the 90-day period or an additional period, not to exceed one year, as specified by the director, if written notice is not given that a qualified person is then actively in charge of the office, the agency license shall be
 automatically suspended.

If the licensee
 fails to give written notice at the end of the 30-day period, the agency license shall be automatically suspended.

A license suspended under this section may be reinstated upon payment of the reinstatement fee and submission of a reinstatement application.

A person who performs any act for which a repossession agency license is required during the period of suspension is subject to the penal provisions of Article 3 (commencing with Section 7502), in addition to the provisions of Article 9 (commencing with Section 7508) and Article 10 (commencing with Section 7510).

(b) In the case of the death of a person licensed as an individual,
 an immediate family member shall be entitled to continue the business under the same license for 120 days following the death of the licensee. Except as provided in subdivision (c), at the end of the 120-day period, the license shall be automatically canceled.

(c) (1) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), in the case of the death of a person licensed as an individual, an immediate family member shall be granted a license to continue the business under the same license number and business name if the immediate family member submits a written request and an initial application and application fee to the bureau within 120 days following the death of the licensee.

(B) If two or more immediate family members submit separate written requests pursuant to this paragraph to continue the license, the bureau shall grant the license to an immediate family member only if a court order issued within 120 days following the death of the licensee gives ownership of the asset clearly and unequivocally
 to that immediate family member.

 (2) The immediate family member requesting the continuance of the license pursuant to this subdivision shall be subject to all of the requirements of this chapter, including the provisions of Section 7503.5.

(d) In the case of the death or disassociation of a partner of an entity licensed as a partnership, the licensee shall notify the bureau, in writing, within 30 days from the death or disassociation of the individual. If notice is given,
 the license shall remain in force for 90 days following the death or disassociation. At the end of that period, the license shall be automatically canceled. If the licensee fails to notify the bureau within the 30-day period, the license shall be automatically canceled at the end of that period.

(e) A license extended under this section is subject to all other provisions of this chapter.

(f) For purposes of this section, “immediate family member” means a spouse, father, mother, brother, sister, son, daughter, granddaughter,
 or grandson of the deceased licensee who submits proof of that relationship.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 354, Sec. 2.   (AB 2759)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

7505.4.

Except as herein otherwise provided, no person shall be in charge of any licensed office if the person has ever had a license revoked or suspended or has ever been denied registration pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 7506); or if the person was a partner, managing employee, or officer, of a repossession agency the license of which has been revoked for cause.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1138, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

7505.5.

The person deemed to be actively in charge of an office shall be the holder of a qualification certificate and the certificate, together with the current renewal certificate, shall be prominently displayed below the repossession agency’s license. The person shall be in charge of not more than two licensed locations. The person shall share equally with the licensee the responsibility for the conduct of the business and the personnel of the licensed agency or agencies, if more than one agency is licensed at that location. This section shall not apply to any licensee who notifies the bureau in writing that the licensee is not conducting any business, but wishes to maintain a current license status with the bureau. When the licensee resumes conducting business, the licensee shall so inform the bureau in writing
 within 30 days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 307, Sec. 79.   (SB 821)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Registration [7506.3. - 7506.14.]

7506.3.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, every person entering the employ of, or contracting with, a licensee or multiple licensee after the effective date of this article shall immediately complete an application for an initial registration or a reregistration and file the appropriate application with the chief within 15 working days after the commencement of employment or contracted services for the licensee or multiple licensee for whom the applicant is employed or contracted. Applicants for registration must be at least 18 years of age. An applicant who declares as true any material matter pursuant to this section that he or she knows to be false is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(a) An initial registration application shall be required of those persons who have not previously submitted an application for registration, or been registered as a registrant.

(b) A reregistration application shall be required of those persons who have previously submitted or been registered as a registrant.

(c) No registrant of a multiple licensee shall be required to file more than one application for registration or reregistration for each multiple licensee.

(d) The application form shall contain a statement informing the applicant that a false or dishonest answer to a question may be grounds for denial or subsequent suspension or revocation of a registration or reregistration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 402, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

7506.4.

The application for an initial registration or a reregistration under this article shall be on a form prescribed by the director and shall be accompanied by the fee provided for in Section 7511.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1245, Sec. 5.   Effective September 18, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

7506.5.

All information obtained on the application shall be confidential pursuant to the Information Practices Act (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1798) of Title 1.8 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code) and shall not be released to the public except for the registrant’s full name, the licensee’s name and address, and the registration number. The application shall be verified and shall include:

(a) The full name, residence address, residence telephone number, date and place of birth, and driver’s license number of the applicant or registrant.

(b) A statement listing any and all names used by the applicant or registrant, other than the name by which he or she is currently known. If the applicant or registrant has never used a name other than his or her true name, this fact shall be set forth in the statement.

(c) The name and address of the licensee and the date the employment or contract commenced.

(d) The title of the position occupied by the applicant or registrant and a description of his or her duties.

(e) Two recent photographs of the applicant or registrant, of a type prescribed by the chief, and two classifiable sets of his or her fingerprints, one set of which shall be forwarded to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for purposes of a background check.

(f) The bureau may impose a fee not to exceed three dollars ($3) for processing classifiable fingerprint cards submitted by applicants, excluding those submitted into an electronic fingerprint system using electronic fingerprint technology.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 456, Sec. 6.5.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

7506.6.

Qualified certificate holders who comply with other provisions of this chapter are not required to register under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1138, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

7506.7.

Employees of a licensee who are engaged exclusively in stenographic, typing, filing, clerical, in-office skip tracing, or other office activities are not required to register under this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 505, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

7506.8.

(a) The director may refuse to register any applicant if the individual has failed to pay any or all fines assessed pursuant to Section 7501.7 and not resolved in accordance with that section, or has committed any act that, if committed by a licensee, would be grounds for refusing to issue a license or for the suspension or revocation of a license under this chapter, or has committed acts or crimes constituting grounds for denial of a license under Section 480.

The denial shall be in writing and shall describe the basis for the denial. The denial shall inform the applicant that if he or she desires a hearing to contest the denial, the hearing shall be requested of the director, in writing, within 30 days of the issuance of the denial.

When a hearing is held under this section, it shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(b) The director may suspend or revoke a registration if the registrant has committed any act that, if committed by a licensee, would be grounds for refusing to issue a license or for the suspension or revocation of a license under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 505, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

7506.9.

(a) Upon the issuance of the initial registration, reregistration, or renewal, the chief shall issue to the registrant a suitable pocket identification card. At the request of the registrant, the identification card may include a photograph of the registrant. The photograph shall be of a size prescribed by the bureau. The card shall contain the name of the licensee with whom the registrant is registered. The applicant may request to be issued an enhanced pocket card that shall be composed of durable material and may incorporate technologically advanced security features. The bureau may charge a fee sufficient to reimburse the department for costs for furnishing the enhanced pocket card. The fee charged may not exceed the actual cost for system
 development, maintenance, and processing necessary to provide the service, and may not exceed six dollars ($6). If the applicant does not request an enhanced card, the department shall issue a standard card at no cost to the applicant.

(b) Until the registration certificate is issued or denied, a person may be assigned to work with a temporary registration on a secure form prescribed by the chief, and issued by the qualified certificate holder, for a period not to exceed 120 days from the date the employment or contract commenced, provided the person signs a declaration under penalty of perjury that he or she has not been convicted of a felony or committed any other act constituting grounds for denial of a registration pursuant to Section 7506.8 (unless he or she declares that the conviction of a felony or the commission of a
 specified act or acts occurred prior to the issuance of a registration by the chief and the conduct was not the cause of any subsequent suspension or termination of a registration), and that he or she has read and understands the provisions of this chapter.

(c) The chief shall issue an additional temporary registration for not less than 60 days nor more than 120 days, if the chief determines that the investigation of the applicant will take longer to complete than the initial temporary registration time period.

(d) No person shall perform the duties of a registrant for a licensee unless the person has in his or her possession a valid repossessor registration card, a hardcopy printout or electronic copy of the bureau’s approval from the bureau’s Internet Web site, which may
 include an easily legible electronic screenshot of that information, or evidence of a valid temporary registration or registration renewal as described in subdivision (b) or (e) of this section or subdivision (f) of Section 7506.10. Every person, while engaged in any activity for which licensure is required, shall display his or her valid pocket card, as provided by regulation.

(e) A person may work as a registrant pending receipt of the registration card if he or she has been approved by the bureau and carries on his or her person a hardcopy printout or electronic copy of the bureau’s approval from the bureau’s Internet Web site, which may include an easily legible
 electronic screenshot of that information, and a valid picture identification.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 740, Sec. 3.   (AB 281)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7506.10.

(a) Every initial registration shall expire one year following the date of issuance, unless renewed as provided in this section. A renewal registration shall expire two years following the date of renewal, unless renewed as provided in this section.

(b) At least 60 days prior to the expiration, the bureau shall mail a renewal form to the registrant at the licensee’s place of business. A registrant who desires to renew their registration shall forward to the bureau for each registration the properly completed renewal form obtained from the bureau, with the renewal fee prescribed by this chapter, for renewal of their registration. Until the registration renewal certificate is issued, a
 registrant may continue to work with a temporary registration renewal certificate on a secure form prescribed by the chief and issued by the qualified certificate holder that has been embossed by the bureau with the state seal for a period not to exceed 120 days from the date of expiration of the registration.

(c) A licensee shall provide to their registrants information regarding procedures for renewal of registration.

(d) A registration that is not renewed within 60 days after its expiration may not be renewed. If the registration is renewed within 60 days after its expiration, the registrant, as a condition precedent to renewal, shall pay the renewal fee and also pay the delinquency fee prescribed in this chapter. Registrants working with expired registrations shall pay all
 accrued fees and penalties prior to renewal or reregistration.

(e) Upon renewal, evidence of renewal, as the director may
 prescribe, shall be issued to the registrant. If evidence of renewal has not been delivered to the registrant prior to the date of expiration, the registrant may present evidence of renewal to substantiate continued registration for a period not to exceed 60 days after the date of expiration or a temporary registration renewal certificate, as described in subdivision (b).

(f) A registration shall not be renewed until any and all fines assessed pursuant to this chapter and not resolved in accordance with this chapter have been paid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 511, Sec. 39.   (SB 1495)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

7506.11.

(a) Each registration is valid until the registrant ceases performing services for the licensee indicated on the registration card or until the registration expires.

(b) Each person registered under this article shall notify the chief, in writing, within 30 days of any change in employment or contract status with a licensee. If the person ceases to be employed by or perform services for a licensee, the licensee shall notify the chief, in writing, within 30 days. The registered individual shall surrender his or her registration card to the licensee. The licensee shall forward the registration card to the chief. If at some subsequent time the person is again employed or retained by a licensee, he or she shall apply for reregistration in the manner provided in this article.

(c) Each registrant, while registered, shall notify the chief, in writing, within 30 days after any change in his or her residence address.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 456, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

7506.12.

The proceedings under this article shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the director shall have all the powers granted therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1138, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

7506.13.

(a) The licensee shall at all times be responsible for ascertaining that his or her registrants are currently registered or have made proper application for registration as provided in this article. The licensee may not have in his or her employment or under contract a person subject to registration who has not registered within the time required or whose registration has expired or been revoked, denied, suspended, or canceled.

(b) The bureau shall keep current and accurate records of all persons registered under this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 456, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

7506.14.

If the chief determines that continued services by an applicant for registration in his or her current capacity may present undue hazard to public safety, the licensee, upon proper notification from the chief, shall suspend the applicant from rendering services in that capacity until the licensee is notified in writing by the chief within 60 days from the date of notification of suspension that the applicant’s registration has been approved or denied.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 456, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Conduct of Business [7507. - 7507.13.]

7507.

A licensee shall notify the bureau within 30 days of any change of its corporate officers or of the addition of any partners. Applications, on forms prescribed by the director, shall be submitted by all new officers and partners. The director may suspend or revoke a license issued under this chapter if the director determines that a new officer or partner has committed any act that constitutes grounds for the denial of a license pursuant to Section 7503.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 568, Sec. 92.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

7507.1.

A licensee or a qualified certificate holder shall, within 30 days after such change, notify the bureau of any change of his or her address. The principal place of business may be at a residence or at a business address, but it shall be the place at which the licensee maintains a permanent office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1299, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

7507.2.

(a) A licensee is responsible for those actions that are performed in violation of this chapter by his or her registrants, including his or her manager, when acting within the course and scope of his or her employment or contract.

(b) Each licensee shall maintain a file or record of the name, address, commencing date of employment or retention, and position of each registrant, and the date of termination of the employment or contract when a registrant is terminated. The file and records, together with usual compensation records, shall be available for inspection by the bureau, and copies thereof, and information pertaining thereto or contained therein, shall be submitted to the bureau upon request.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 456, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

7507.3.

A repossession agency shall be required to keep and maintain adequate records of all transactions, including, but not limited to, assignment or repossession order forms; vehicle report of repossession required by Section 28 of the Vehicle Code; vehicle condition reports, including odometer readings, if available; personal effects inventory; notice of seizure; and records of all transactions pertaining to the sale of collateral that has been repossessed, including, but not limited to, bids solicited and received, cash received, deposits made to the trust account, remittances to the seller, and allocation of any moneys not so remitted to appropriate ledger accounts. Records, including bank statements of
 the trust account, shall be retained for a period of not less than four years and shall be available for examination by the bureau upon demand. In addition, collateral and personal effects storage areas shall be made accessible for inspection by the bureau upon demand. An assignment or repossession order form may be an original, a photocopy, a facsimile copy, or a copy stored in an electronic format.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 509, Sec. 3.   (AB 1859)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

7507.4.

A licensed repossession agency or its registrants shall not make demand for payment in lieu of repossession and shall not sell collateral recovered under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 340, Sec. 3.   (AB 791)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

7507.5.

No charge shall be made for services incurred in connection with the recovery, transportation, and storage of collateral except under terms agreed to by the legal owner at the time of the repossession authorization or specifically agreed upon at a subsequent time. Repair work, cleaning, or detailing shall not be performed and shall not be charged to the legal owner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 740, Sec. 4.   (AB 281)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7507.6.

(a) Within seven days after a violent act has occurred involving a licensee, or any officer, partner, qualified certificate holder, registrant, or employee of a licensee, while acting within the course and scope of his or her employment or contract, that results in a police report or bodily harm or bodily injury, the licensee or the licensee’s qualified certificate holder or registrant, shall mail or deliver to the chief a notice concerning the incident upon a form provided by the bureau.

(b) Within seven days after the occurrence of a violent act or a threatened violent act involving a licensee, or any officer, partner, qualified certificate holder, registrant, or employee of a
 licensee, while acting within the course and scope of his or her employment or contract, that results in a police report or bodily harm or bodily injury, the licensee or the licensee’s qualified certificate holder or registrant shall send by certified mail, return receipt requested, a notice containing information about the incident to the person or individual who made the assignment. If the assignor is not the legal owner, the assignor shall notify the legal owner of the contents of the notice.

(c) A licensee, qualified certificate holder, or registrant may send the notice set forth in subdivision (b) for a violent act or threatened violent act even if a police report is not made or no bodily harm or bodily injury occurs. Any notice of a threatened violent act provided pursuant to subdivision (b) may only be used to notify a subsequent assignee and not for any collateral purpose. Nothing in this subdivision or subdivision (b) shall be
 construed to provide immunity against any claim for defamation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 800, Sec. 3.   (SB 1196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

7507.7.

Within seven days after receiving a final civil court judgment filed against the licensee or any officer, partner, qualified certificate holder, or registrant of a licensee, for an amount of more than the then prevailing maximum claim that may be brought in a small claims court pertaining to an act done within the course and scope of his or her employment or contract, the licensee, or his or her qualified certificate holder, or his or her registrant, shall mail or deliver to the chief a copy of the judgment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 505, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

7507.8.

Every advertisement by a licensee, soliciting or advertising business, shall contain the licensee’s name, address, and license number as they appear in the records of the bureau.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1138, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

7507.9.

Personal effects shall be removed from the collateral, including any personal effect that is mounted but detachable from the collateral by a release mechanism. A complete and accurate inventory of the personal effects shall be made, and the personal effects shall be labeled and stored by the licensee for a minimum of 60 days in a secure manner, except those personal effects removed by or in the presence of the debtor or the party in possession of the collateral at the time of the repossession. If the licensee or the licensee’s agent cannot determine whether the property attached to the collateral is a personal effect or a part of the collateral, then that fact shall be noted on the inventory and the licensee or agent shall not be obligated to remove the item from the collateral, unless the item can be removed without the use of tools, in which case
 it shall be removed and inventoried. The licensee or the licensee’s agent shall notify the debtor that if the debtor takes the position that an item is a personal effect, then the debtor shall contact the legal owner to resolve the issue.

(a) The date and time the inventory is made shall be indicated. The permanent records of the licensee shall indicate the name of the employee or registrant who performed the inventory.

(b) The following items of personal effects are items determined to present a danger or health hazard when recovered by the licensee and shall be disposed of in the following manner:

(1) (A) Deadly weapons and dangerous drugs shall be turned over to any law enforcement agency for retention. These items shall be entered on the inventory and a notation shall be made as to the date,
 time, and place the deadly weapon or dangerous drug was turned over to the law enforcement agency, and a receipt from the law enforcement agency shall be maintained in the records of the repossession agency.

(B) Any other instrument or weapon, including, but not limited to, any instrument or weapon of the kind commonly known as a blackjack, slungshot, billy, sandclub, sandbag, metal knuckles, dirk, dagger, any knife having a blade longer than five inches, any razor with an unguarded blade, and any metal pipe or bar used or intended to be used as a club shall be inventoried and noted as “disposed of, dangerous device” and the item shall be disposed of in a reasonable and safe manner.

(2) Combustibles shall be inventoried and noted as “disposed of, dangerous combustible,” and the item shall be disposed of in a reasonable and safe manner.

(3) Food and other health hazard items shall be inventoried and noted as “disposed of, health hazard,” and disposed of in a reasonable and safe manner.

(c) Personal effects may be disposed of after being held for at least 60 days. The inventory, and adequate information as to how, when, and to whom the personal effects were disposed of, shall be filed in the permanent records of the licensee and retained for four years.

(d) The inventory shall include the name, address, business hours, and telephone number of the repossession agency to contact for recovering the personal effects and an itemization of all personal effects removal and storage charges that will be made by the repossession agency. The inventory shall also include the following statement: “Please be advised that the property listed on this inventory will be
 disposed of by the repossession agency after being held for 60 days from the date of this notice IF UNCLAIMED.”

(e) The inventory shall be provided to a debtor not later than 48 hours after the recovery of the collateral, except that if:

(1) The 48-hour period encompasses a Saturday, Sunday, or postal holiday, the inventory shall be provided no later than 72 hours after the recovery of the collateral.

(2) The 48-hour period encompasses a Saturday or Sunday and a postal holiday, the inventory shall be provided no later than 96 hours after the recovery of the collateral.

(3) Inventory resulting from repossession of a yacht, motor home, or travel trailer is such that it shall take at least 4 hours to inventory, then the inventory shall be provided no later
 than 96 hours after the recovery of the collateral. When the 96-hour period encompasses a Saturday, Sunday, or postal holiday, the inventory shall be provided no later than 120 hours after the recovery of the collateral.

(4) The licensee is unable to open a locked compartment that is part of the collateral, the available inventory shall be provided no later than 96 hours after the recovery of the collateral. When the 96-hour period encompasses a Saturday, Sunday, or postal holiday, the inventory shall be provided no later than 120 hours after the recovery of the collateral.

(f) Environmental, Olympic, special interest, or other license plates issued pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 5000), Article 8.4 (commencing with Section 5060), or Article 8.5 (commencing with Section 5100) of Chapter 1 of Division 3 of the Vehicle Code that remain the personal effects of the
 debtor shall be removed from the collateral and inventoried pursuant to this section. If the plates are not claimed by the debtor within 60 days, they shall either (1) be effectively destroyed and the licensee shall, within 30 days thereafter, notify the Department of Motor Vehicles of their effective destruction on a form promulgated by the chief that has been approved as to form by the Director of the Department of Motor Vehicles; or (2) be retained by the licensee indefinitely to be returned to the debtor upon request, in which case the licensee shall not charge more than 60 days’ storage on the plates.

(g) The notice may be given by regular mail addressed to the current address of the debtor, if known, or by personal service, at the option of the repossession agency.

(h) With the consent of the licensee, the debtor waives the preparation and presentation of an inventory if the
 debtor redeems the personal effects or other personal property not covered by a security interest within the time period for the notices required by this section and signs a statement that the debtor has received all the property.

(i) If personal effects or other personal property not covered by a security agreement are to be released to someone other than the debtor, the repossession agency must receive written authorization to do so from the debtor.

(j) A licensee shall not sell personal effects or other personal property not covered by a security agreement and remit money from the sale to a third party, including, but not limited to, any lending institution.

(k) The inventory shall be a confidential document. A licensee shall only disclose the contents of the inventory under the following circumstances:

(1) In response to the order of a court having jurisdiction to issue the order.

(2) In compliance with a lawful subpoena issued by a court of competent jurisdiction.

(3) When the debtor has consented in writing to the release and the written consent is signed and dated by the debtor subsequent to the repossession and states the entity or entities to whom the contents of the inventory may be disclosed.

(4) To the debtor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 484, Sec. 4.   (SB 1454)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

7507.10.

(a) A licensee shall serve a debtor with a notice of seizure as soon as possible after the recovery of collateral and not later than 48 hours, except that if the 48-hour period encompasses a Saturday, Sunday, or postal holiday, the notice of seizure shall be provided not later than 72 hours or, if the 48-hour period encompasses a Saturday or Sunday and a postal holiday, the notice of seizure shall be provided not later than 96 hours, after the repossession of collateral. The notice shall include all of the following:

(1) The name, address, and telephone number of the legal owner to be contacted regarding the repossession.

(2) The name, address, and telephone number of the repossession agency to be
 contacted regarding the repossession.

(3) A statement printed on the notice containing the following: “Repossessors are regulated by the Bureau of Security and Investigative Services, Department of Consumer Affairs, Sacramento, CA. Repossessors are required to provide you, not later than 48 hours after the recovery of collateral, with an inventory of personal effects or other personal property recovered during repossession unless the 48-hour period encompasses a Saturday, Sunday, or a postal holiday, then the inventory shall be provided no later than 96 hours after the recovery of collateral.”

(4) A disclosure that “Damage to a vehicle during or subsequent to a repossession and only while the vehicle is in possession of the repossession agency and which is caused by the repossession agency is the liability of the repossession agency. A mechanical, electrical, or tire failure, or
 the loss of, or any damage to, or as a result of, or caused by, any aftermarket parts and accessories not in compliance with Section 24008 of the Vehicle Code shall not be the responsibility of the repossession agency unless the failure, damage, or loss is due to the negligence of the repossession agency.”
